Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1366.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Public property towing and impound practices study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The public property towing and impound practices study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the senate who are appointed by the president of the senate and who are not members of the same political party. The president of the senate shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 2. Two members of the house of representatives who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who are not members of the same political party. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 3. One member who represents a statewide public property towing association that is dedicated to advancing the training, safety and professionalism of tow truck operators and that operates in an urban county with a population of more than eight hundred thousand persons and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 4. One member who represents the public property towing industry that operates in a rural county with a population of eight hundred thousand persons or less and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 5. One member who represents the department of public safety and who is appointed by the governor. B. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation, but members are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. The committee shall: 1. Review current fees, rates, fines and administrative charges for the department of public safety initiated accident, arrest, breakdown, disabled and abandoned vehicles tows. 2. Examine the qualifications and operational standards for public property towing companies to be considered qualified for government-authorized towing of vehicles. 3. Evaluate minimum insurance requirements and background check standards for towing company owners and operators. 4. Review the impact of the laws of this state and rules and department of public safety policies relating to public property towing. D. The committee may: 1. Request information and data from state and local agencies regarding towing contracts and impound statistics. 2. Hold public hearings to receive testimony from industry experts, law enforcement agencies and the public. E. On or before December 31, 2026, the committee shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations for administrative or legislative action to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. F. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2027. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.